src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-sedggjed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - sedggjed: # Verb 'to loom' - full paradigm
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sedggjam
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: sedggjak
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sedggai
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: sedggjep
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: sedggjeʹped
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sedggje 
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: sedggjet 

     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sedggjem
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sedggjiǩ
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sedggji
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [sedggjim,sedggjin,sedggjiim,sedggjiin]
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [sedggjid, sedggjiid]
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: sedggje
     sedggjed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: sedggješ

     sedggjed+V+Pot+Sg1: sedggjeʹžem
     sedggjed+V+Pot+Sg2: sedggjeʹžiǩ
     sedggjed+V+Pot+Sg3: sedggjež
     sedggjed+V+Pot+Pl1: [sedggjeʹžep, sedggjeʹžim]
     sedggjed+V+Pot+Pl2: sedggjeʹžid 
     sedggjed+V+Pot+Pl3: sedggjeʹže
     sedggjed+V+Pot+Sg4: sedggjeʹžet
     sedggjed+V+Pot+ConNeg: sedggjeʹže

     sedggjed+V+Cond+Sg1: sedggjeʹčem
     sedggjed+V+Cond+Sg2: sedggjeʹčiǩ
     sedggjed+V+Cond+Sg3: sedggjeʹči
     sedggjed+V+Cond+Pl1: [sedggjeʹčim, sedggjeʹčep]
     sedggjed+V+Cond+Pl2: sedggjeʹčid
     sedggjed+V+Cond+Pl3: sedggjeʹče
     sedggjed+V+Cond+Sg4: sedggjeʹčeš
     sedggjed+V+Cond+ConNeg: sedggjeʹče

     sedggjed+V+Imprt+Sg2: sidggu
     sedggjed+V+Imprt+Sg3: sedggjââǥǥas
     sedggjed+V+Imprt+Pl1: sedggjâkap
     sedggjed+V+Imprt+Pl2: sedggjeʹǩed
     sedggjed+V+Imprt+Pl3: sedggjâkaz
     sedggjed+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: sidggu

     sedggjed+V+Imprt+ConNeg: sedggjuku

     sedggjed+V+Inf: sedggjed    
     sedggjed+V+Actio+Ess: sedggjeʹmen
     sedggjed+V+Actio: sedggjam
     sedggjed+V+Act+PrsPrc: sedggjeei
     sedggjed+V+Act+PrfPrc: sedggjam
     sedggjed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [sedggjummu,sedggjum]
     sedggjed+V+VAbess: [sedggjeǩâni, sedggjeǩeânai]
     sedggjed+V+Ger+Ess: sedggjeen
     sedggjed+V+Ger+Instr: sedggjeeʹl
